Maine, session 132, LD1683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §408-A, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Request accompanied by petition; no fees; timing of compliance. If the
requestor submits a request pursuant to this section for a public record and that request is
accompanied by a petition signed by at least 150 individuals registered to vote in this State
making the same request, the agency or official having custody or control of the public
record may not charge the requestor any of the costs incurred by the agency or official in
complying with the request, including those specified in subsection 8.
An agency or official that receives a request pursuant to this subsection shall provide an
update regarding the status of the request at least every 30 working days after the date the
request is received, as determined pursuant to subsection 3.